Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 23.2 The Comprehensive Watershed and Marine Monitoring Act of 2004

46-23.2-1.
Title.

The chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Comprehensive Watershed and Marine Monitoring Act of 2004.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1.

46-23.2-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds and declares that there is a need for an environmental monitoring system in the state that is capable of:

Measuring the changing conditions in the functionality and health of the waters of the state, including, but not limited to, Narragansett Bay and its watersheds, with one purpose being identifying and predicting potential problems in the marine and freshwater habitats;

Providing a data-based management system that employs central database via the internet to store an internet-based electronic system to monitor, store and disseminate the analysis of this data to decision-makers and the public;

Establishing a mechanism to coordinate and make consistent, monitoring efforts between government agencies, municipalities, nonprofit organizations and universities; and

Providing the comprehensive data needed to assess a sudden perturbation in the marine and freshwater environments and to contribute to efforts of disaster prevention, preparedness, response and recovery as defined in chapter 15 of title 30 entitled “The Rhode Island Emergency Management Act.”

The general assembly recognizes and declares that the health of the waters of the state, including, but not limited to, Narragansett Bay and its watersheds needs to be monitored comprehensively on a long-term basis in order to be proactive in planning and responsive to potential problems in the environment, including those that may arise due to a changing climate. The availability of consistent environmental data supports planning and management and provides resource managers, decision-makers and citizens with information on how marine and freshwater habitats are responding to management programs and what adjustments need to be made to existing programs or what new programs must be implemented to achieve healthy marine and freshwater environments.

The general assembly recognizes the need for an integrated mechanism by which individual monitoring efforts can be coordinated and managed as a system in which the functionality of Narragansett Bay, its watersheds and other watersheds are measured and individual planning and management efforts are adjusted to respond to support effective environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 4.

46-23.2-3.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to establish a comprehensive watershed and marine monitoring system that provides consistent and useful data to resource managers, decision-makers and the public concerning the health of the marine environment of the state. The Rhode Island environmental monitoring collaborative is hereby established with the purposes of organizing, coordinating, maintaining and supporting the watershed and marine monitoring system of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1.

46-23.2-4.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Collaborative” means a group of organizations, agencies and individuals assembled for the purposes of organizing, coordinating, maintaining and supporting the watershed and marine monitoring programs within Narragansett Bay and the watersheds of the state.

“Monitoring program” means any scientific or educational data collection activity that measures the changing conditions in, and the functionality and health of the waters of the state.

“Perturbation” means a disturbance in the natural environment that is produced from some force additional to that which causes the natural state of that environment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1.

46-23.2-5.
The Rhode Island environmental monitoring collaborative — Creation.

There is hereby authorized, created and established the “Rhode Island environmental monitoring collaborative” (also known as the “collaborative”) with such powers as are set forth in this chapter, for the purposes of organizing, coordinating, maintaining and supporting the environmental monitoring systems within Narragansett Bay, its watersheds and other watersheds in Rhode Island. The collaborative shall consist of ten (10) members, one representative from each of the following: Coastal Institute at the University of Rhode Island (“URI”) Bay Campus (chair); coastal resources management council; department of environmental management, water quality; department of environmental management, fisheries; department of health; URI Watershed Watch; URI Graduate School of Oceanography; Narragansett Bay commission; Statewide Planning Program (RIGIS) Division; and URI Environmental Data Center. Members of the collaborative shall serve without salary but may be paid expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The collaborative shall work with other organizations and agencies that monitor Narragansett Bay and its watersheds to perform the powers and duties established herein. These include, but are not limited to, the Environmental Protection Agency, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Agency, Natural Resources Conservation Service, U.S. Fish and Wildlife, U.S. Geological Survey, Massachusetts Executive Office of Environmental Affairs, Narragansett Bay Estuary Program, Brown University, Roger Williams University, Rhode Island Natural History Survey, Save the Bay, Rhode Island Sea Grant, URI Cooperative Extension, and the Rhode Island Rivers Council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 4.

46-23.2-6.
Powers and duties.

The collaborative shall have the following powers:

To effectuate and implement a state monitoring strategy that addresses critical state resource management needs, including, but not limited to, water quality protection, water pollution control, fisheries and wildlife management, habitat restoration, coastal management, public health protection and emergency response and that assesses and tracks environmental health and function. Within six (6) months of its enactment, the collaborative shall adopt a statewide monitoring strategy that will provide cost-effective and useful policies, standards, protocols and guidelines for monitoring programs undertaken for the waters of the state. This strategy shall be reviewed and updated every five (5) years. This strategy shall include the following elements:

An inventory of existing monitoring programs;

An outline of additional monitoring programs the state needs;

A list of indicators that will be used to measure the health of the marine and freshwater habitats of the state;

Identification of data standards and protocols that will be used on a reasonable and consistent basis by monitoring programs that contribute data to the state monitoring system;

A plan for data sharing among all monitoring programs that optimizes the ability of both monitors and users to securely access monitoring data via the Internet and to retain the integrity of such data;

A plan to provide data from the state environmental monitoring system for disaster prevention, preparedness, response and recovery efforts in the marine environment; and

A communications strategy to provide for public access to monitoring data.

To assist with the development and implementation of a state water monitoring and assessment program, developed consistent with guidance issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and to augment such a program to achieve the purposes of this strategy set forth in subdivision (1).

To prepare an annual report in the month of January to the governor and general assembly on the activities for the preceding year as well as the predicted financial needs of the system for the upcoming fiscal year.

To enter into data sharing agreements with federal and state agencies, municipalities and nongovernmental organizations for the purposes of coordination and management of monitoring data and programs.

To accept grants, donations and contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, from this state and its agencies, or from any other source, and to use or expend those moneys, services, materials or other contributions in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

To enter into agreements for staff support that it deems necessary for its work, and to contract with consultants for the services it may require to the extent permitted by its financial resources.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 16, § 4.

46-23.2-7.
Assistance by state officers, departments, boards and commissions.

All state agencies may render any services to the collaborative within their respective functions as may be requested by the collaborative.

Upon request of the collaborative, any state agency is authorized and empowered to transfer to the collaborative any officers and employees as it may deem necessary from time to time to assist the collaborative in carrying out its functions and duties under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1.

46-23.2-8.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 210, § 1.